Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 1. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 28.90.010.
Penalties for violations of law, regulations, and municipal ordinances.

It is a misdemeanor for a person to violate a provision of this title unless the violation is by this title or other law declared to be a felony or an infraction.

A person convicted of a misdemeanor for a violation of a provision of this title for which another penalty is not specifically provided is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or by both. In addition, the privilege to drive or the registration of vehicles may be suspended or revoked.

Unless otherwise specified by law a person convicted of a violation of a regulation adopted under this title, or a municipal ordinance regulating vehicles or traffic when the municipal ordinance does not correspond to a provision of this title, is guilty of an infraction and is punishable by a fine not to exceed $300.

An infraction, as provided for in (c) of this section, is not considered a criminal offense and may not result in imprisonment, nor is a fine imposed for the commission of an infraction considered a penal or criminal punishment; nor may the commission of a single infraction result in the loss of a driver’s license or privilege to drive in this state except as may result from the accumulation of points under AS

28.15.221

—

28.15.261

, or the registration of vehicles; nor does a person cited with an infraction have a right to trial by jury or to court-appointed counsel.

[Repealed, § 5 ch 85 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 50-1-8 ACLA 1949; am § 12 ch 241 SLA 1976; am §§ 22, 23 ch 144 SLA 1977; am § 5 ch 85 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

28.35.230

.
Renumbered as
AS

28.40.050

in 1984 and renumbered again in 2006.

Sec. 28.90.020.
Breath test result validity.

Except for an offense under AS

28.35.280

, if an offense described under this title requires that a chemical test of a person’s breath produce a particular result, and the chemical test is administered by a properly calibrated instrument approved by the Department of Public Safety, the result described by statute is not affected by the instrument’s working tolerance.

History.

(§ 17 ch 143 SLA 1996)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

28.40.060

.
Renumbered in 2006.

Sec. 28.90.030.
Fines for offenses committed within highway work zones and traffic safety corridors doubled.

Whenever a person violates a provision of this title or a regulation adopted under the authority of this title within a highway work zone or traffic safety corridor, notwithstanding the amount of the fine or the maximum fine set under this title, the fine, or maximum fine, is double the amount provided in this title.

Fines imposed and collected under this section for offenses that are committed in a traffic safety corridor shall be separately accounted for under AS

37.05.142

.

Notwithstanding the requirements of (b) of this section and AS

37.05.142

, the Alaska Court System shall deposit fines collected under this section for offenses committed in a traffic safety corridor in the general fund if the fine is collected at a court location where separate accounting for traffic safety corridor fines is not achievable.

The administrative director of the Alaska Court System shall notify the Department of Administration

of court locations where separate accounting under (b) of this section is not achievable; and

when a court location identified under (1) of this subsection becomes able to separately account for fines under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 1998; am §§ 4, 5 ch 45 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

28.40.070

.
Renumbered in 2006.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 45, SLA 2006 (SB 261), relating to the designation of traffic safety corridors, see 2006 Senate Journal 2037 — 2038.

Sec. 28.90.035.
Prohibition of damage claims regarding highway work zone signs.

A claim for damages may not be made against the state or its officers, employees, or agents for an act or omission relating to the designation of and erection of signs regarding a highway work zone.

History.

(§ 6 ch 45 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

28.40.072

and renumbered in 2006.

Sec. 28.90.040.
Administration of highway safety program.

The governor may contract and do all other things necessary on behalf of this state under 23 U.S.C. 401 — 404 (Highway Safety Act of 1966), and may cooperate with interested persons and agencies to effectuate the purposes of that Act. Contracting under this section is governed by AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code).
The governor may designate a person to serve as the governor’s highway safety representative; however, the governor is the official in this state having the ultimate responsibility for dealing with the federal government with respect to programs and activities under the Federal Highway Safety Act of 1966.
The governor shall coordinate the activities relating to highway safety of state departments, agencies, and subdivisions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 19 SLA 1967; am § 2 ch 3 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 1986; am § 53 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

44.19.025

.
Renumbered in 1980 as AS

44.99.001

and in 2004 as AS

28.40.075

.
Renumbered again in 2006.